Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-306
Absence of judge; adjournment until next regular term.

If the judge does not appear by 5 p.m. in the afternoon of the fourth day, the court shall stand adjourned until the next regular term.

Laws 1879, § 30, p. 88;

R.S.1913, § 1165;

C.S.1922, § 1088;

C.S.1929, § 27-306;

R.S.1943, § 24-306.

In adjourning term, clerk acts in a ministerial capacity. Parrott v. Wolcott, 75 Neb. 530, 106 N.W. 607 (1906).